spellchecker/hunspell/bak/bash (1).aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG num
TRY -абвгғдҙеёжзийкҡлмнңоөпрсҫтуүфхһцчшщъыьэәюяАБВГҒДҘЕЁЖЗИЙКҠЛМНҢОӨПРСҪТУҮФХҺЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭӘЮЯ

REP 0


WORDCHARS -

SFX 1 Y 76 # прилагательные A
SFX 1 0 дар/115 [^ь] +Pl
SFX 1 ь дар/115 [ь] +Pl
SFX 1 0 дың/117 [^ь] +Gen
SFX 1 ь дың/117 [ь] +Gen
SFX 1 0 ға/121 [^ь] +Dat
SFX 1 ь ға/121 [ь] +Dat
SFX 1 0 ғараҡ [^ь] +Dat+Comp
SFX 1 ь ғараҡ [ь] +Dat+Comp
SFX 1 0 ды/121 [^ь] +Acc
SFX 1 ь ды/121 [ь] +Acc
SFX 1 0 дан/117,339 [^ь] +Abl
SFX 1 ь дан/117,339 [ь] +Abl
SFX 1 0 да/121,339 [^ь] +Loc
SFX 1 ь да/121,339 [ь] +Loc
SFX 1 0 дараҡ [^ь] +Loc+Comp
SFX 1 ь дараҡ [ь] +Loc+Comp
SFX 1 0 мын/126 [^ь] +Pred1Sg
SFX 1 ь мын/126 [ь] +Pred1Sg
SFX 1 0 һың/126 [^ь] +Pred2Sg
SFX 1 ь һың/126 [ь] +Pred2Sg
SFX 1 0 быҙ/130 [^ь] +Pred1Pl
SFX 1 ь быҙ/130 [ь] +Pred1Pl
SFX 1 0 һығыҙ/130 [^ь] +Pred2Pl
SFX 1 ь һығыҙ/130 [ь] +Pred2Pl
SFX 1 0 0/195 [^ь]
SFX 1 ь 0/195 [ь]
SFX 1 0 мы [^ь] +Q
SFX 1 ь мы [ь] +Q
SFX 1 0 мылыр [^ь] +Q+Indf
SFX 1 ь мылыр [ь] +Q+Indf
SFX 1 0 дыр [^ь] +Indf
SFX 1 ь дыр [ь] +Indf
SFX 1 0 сы [^ь] +Clt/сы
SFX 1 ь сы [ь] +Clt/сы
SFX 1 0 дыҡы/135,339 [^ь] +Poss
SFX 1 ь дыҡы/135,339 [ь] +Poss
SFX 1 0 ҡай/139 [^ь] +Dim
SFX 1 ь ҡай/139 [ь] +Dim
SFX 1 0 дай/141 [^ь] +Der/дай
SFX 1 ь дай/141 [ь] +Der/дай
SFX 1 0 са/143 [^ь] +Der/са
SFX 1 ь са/143 [ь] +Der/са
SFX 1 0 дағы/145 [^ь] +Der/дағы
SFX 1 ь дағы/145 [ь] +Der/дағы
SFX 1 0 дағылар/115 [^ь] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 1 ь дағылар/115 [ь] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 1 0 лы/147 [^ь] +Der/лы
SFX 1 ь лы/147 [ь] +Der/лы
SFX 1 0 һыҙ/151 [^ь] +Abe
SFX 1 ь һыҙ/151 [ь] +Abe
SFX 1 0 ғаса/155 [^ь] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 1 ь ғаса/155 [ь] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 1 0 ыраҡтар/115 . +Comp+Pl
SFX 1 0 ыраҡтың/117 . +Comp+Gen
SFX 1 0 ыраҡҡа/121 . +Comp+Dat
SFX 1 0 ыраҡты/121 . +Comp+Acc
SFX 1 0 ыраҡтан/117,339 . +Comp+Abl
SFX 1 0 ыраҡта/121,339 . +Comp+Loc
SFX 1 0 ыраҡмын/126 . +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 1 0 ыраҡһың/126 . +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 1 0 ыраҡбыҙ/130 . +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 1 0 ыраҡһығыҙ/130 . +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 1 0 ыраҡ/205 . +Comp
SFX 1 0 ыраҡмы . +Comp+Q
SFX 1 0 ыраҡмылыр . +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 1 0 ыраҡтыр . +Comp+Indf
SFX 1 0 ыраҡсы . +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 1 0 ыраҡтыҡы/135,339 . +Comp+Poss
SFX 1 0 ыраҡҡай/139 . +Comp+Dim
SFX 1 0 ыраҡтай/141 . +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 1 0 ыраҡса/143 . +Comp+Der/са
SFX 1 0 ыраҡтағы/145 . +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 1 0 ыраҡтағылар/115 . +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 1 0 ыраҡлы/147 . +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 1 0 ыраҡһыҙ/151 . +Comp+Abe
SFX 1 0 ыраҡҡаса/155 . +Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX 327 Y 50 # A34: drop one л from final лл before an affix
SFX 327 л дар/115 лл +Pl
SFX 327 л дың/117 лл +Gen
SFX 327 л ға/121 лл +Dat
SFX 327 л ғараҡ лл +Dat+Comp
SFX 327 л ды/121 лл +Acc
SFX 327 л дан/117,339 лл +Abl
SFX 327 л да/121,339 лл +Loc
SFX 327 л дараҡ лл +Loc+Comp
SFX 327 л мын/126 лл +Pred1Sg
SFX 327 л һың/126 лл +Pred2Sg
SFX 327 л быҙ/130 лл +Pred1Pl
SFX 327 л һығыҙ/130 лл +Pred2Pl
SFX 327 л 0/195 лл
SFX 327 л мы лл +Q
SFX 327 л мылыр лл +Q+Indf
SFX 327 л дыр лл +Indf
SFX 327 л сы лл +Clt/сы
SFX 327 л дыҡы/135,339 лл +Poss
SFX 327 л ҡай/139 лл +Dim
SFX 327 л дай/141 лл +Der/дай
SFX 327 л са/143 лл +Der/са
SFX 327 л дағы/145 лл +Der/дағы
SFX 327 л дағылар/115 лл +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 327 л лы/147 лл +Der/лы
SFX 327 л һыҙ/151 лл +Abe
SFX 327 л ғаса/155 лл +Der/ҡаса
SFX 327 л ыраҡтар/115 лл +Comp+Pl
SFX 327 л ыраҡтың/117 лл +Comp+Gen
SFX 327 л ыраҡҡа/121 лл +Comp+Dat
SFX 327 л ыраҡты/121 лл +Comp+Acc
SFX 327 л ыраҡтан/117,339 лл +Comp+Abl
SFX 327 л ыраҡта/121,339 лл +Comp+Loc
SFX 327 л ыраҡмын/126 лл +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 327 л ыраҡһың/126 лл +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 327 л ыраҡбыҙ/130 лл +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 327 л ыраҡһығыҙ/130 лл +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 327 л ыраҡ/205 лл +Comp
SFX 327 л ыраҡмы лл +Comp+Q
SFX 327 л ыраҡмылыр лл +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 327 л ыраҡтыр лл +Comp+Indf
SFX 327 л ыраҡсы лл +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 327 л ыраҡтыҡы/135,339 лл +Comp+Poss
SFX 327 л ыраҡҡай/139 лл +Comp+Dim
SFX 327 л ыраҡтай/141 лл +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 327 л ыраҡса/143 лл +Comp+Der/са
SFX 327 л ыраҡтағы/145 лл +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 327 л ыраҡтағылар/115 лл +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 327 л ыраҡлы/147 лл +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 327 л ыраҡһыҙ/151 лл +Comp+Abe
SFX 327 л ыраҡҡаса/155 лл +Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX 2 Y 76 # прилагательные A
SFX 2 0 дәр/116 [^ь] +Pl
SFX 2 ь дәр/116 [ь] +Pl
SFX 2 0 дең/118 [^ь] +Gen
SFX 2 ь дең/118 [ь] +Gen
SFX 2 0 гә/122 [^ь] +Dat
SFX 2 ь гә/122 [ь] +Dat
SFX 2 0 гәрәк [^ь] +Dat+Comp
SFX 2 ь гәрәк [ь] +Dat+Comp
SFX 2 0 де/122 [^ь] +Acc
SFX 2 ь де/122 [ь] +Acc
SFX 2 0 дән/118,340 [^ь] +Abl
SFX 2 ь дән/118,340 [ь] +Abl
SFX 2 0 дә/122,340 [^ь] +Loc
SFX 2 ь дә/122,340 [ь] +Loc
SFX 2 0 дәрәк [^ь] +Loc+Comp
SFX 2 ь дәрәк [ь] +Loc+Comp
SFX 2 0 мен/127 [^ь] +Pred1Sg
SFX 2 ь мен/127 [ь] +Pred1Sg
SFX 2 0 һең/127 [^ь] +Pred2Sg
SFX 2 ь һең/127 [ь] +Pred2Sg
SFX 2 0 беҙ/131 [^ь] +Pred1Pl
SFX 2 ь беҙ/131 [ь] +Pred1Pl
SFX 2 0 һегеҙ/131 [^ь] +Pred2Pl
SFX 2 ь һегеҙ/131 [ь] +Pred2Pl
SFX 2 0 0/196 [^ь]
SFX 2 ь 0/196 [ь]
SFX 2 0 ме [^ь] +Q
SFX 2 ь ме [ь] +Q
SFX 2 0 мелер [^ь] +Q+Indf
SFX 2 ь мелер [ь] +Q+Indf
SFX 2 0 дер [^ь] +Indf
SFX 2 ь дер [ь] +Indf
SFX 2 0 се [^ь] +Clt/сы
SFX 2 ь се [ь] +Clt/сы
SFX 2 0 деке/136,340 [^ь] +Poss
SFX 2 ь деке/136,340 [ь] +Poss
SFX 2 0 кәй/140 [^ь] +Dim
SFX 2 ь кәй/140 [ь] +Dim
SFX 2 0 дәй/142 [^ь] +Der/дай
SFX 2 ь дәй/142 [ь] +Der/дай
SFX 2 0 сә/144 [^ь] +Der/са
SFX 2 ь сә/144 [ь] +Der/са
SFX 2 0 дәге/146 [^ь] +Der/дағы
SFX 2 ь дәге/146 [ь] +Der/дағы
SFX 2 0 дәгеләр/116 [^ь] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 2 ь дәгеләр/116 [ь] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 2 0 ле/148 [^ь] +Der/лы
SFX 2 ь ле/148 [ь] +Der/лы
SFX 2 0 һеҙ/152 [^ь] +Abe
SFX 2 ь һеҙ/152 [ь] +Abe
SFX 2 0 гәсә/156 [^ь] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 2 ь гәсә/156 [ь] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 2 0 ерәктәр/116 . +Comp+Pl
SFX 2 0 ерәктең/118 . +Comp+Gen
SFX 2 0 ерәккә/122 . +Comp+Dat
SFX 2 0 ерәкте/122 . +Comp+Acc
SFX 2 0 ерәктән/118,340 . +Comp+Abl
SFX 2 0 ерәктә/122,340 . +Comp+Loc
SFX 2 0 ерәкмен/127 . +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 2 0 ерәкһең/127 . +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 2 0 ерәкбеҙ/131 . +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 2 0 ерәкһегеҙ/131 . +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 2 0 ерәк/207 . +Comp
SFX 2 0 ерәкме . +Comp+Q
SFX 2 0 ерәкмелер . +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 2 0 ерәктер . +Comp+Indf
SFX 2 0 ерәксе . +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 2 0 ерәктеке/136,340 . +Comp+Poss
SFX 2 0 ерәккәй/140 . +Comp+Dim
SFX 2 0 ерәктәй/142 . +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 2 0 ерәксә/144 . +Comp+Der/са
SFX 2 0 ерәктәге/146 . +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 2 0 ерәктәгеләр/116 . +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 2 0 ерәкле/148 . +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 2 0 ерәкһеҙ/152 . +Comp+Abe
SFX 2 0 ерәккәсә/156 . +Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX 3 Y 50 # прилагательные A
SFX 3 0 дар/115 . +Pl
SFX 3 0 доң/119 . +Gen
SFX 3 0 ға/121 . +Dat
SFX 3 0 ғараҡ . +Dat+Comp
SFX 3 0 до/123 . +Acc
SFX 3 0 дан/117,339 . +Abl
SFX 3 0 да/121,339 . +Loc
SFX 3 0 дараҡ . +Loc+Comp
SFX 3 0 мон/128 . +Pred1Sg
SFX 3 0 һоң/128 . +Pred2Sg
SFX 3 0 боҙ/132 . +Pred1Pl
SFX 3 0 һоғоҙ/132 . +Pred2Pl
SFX 3 0 0/197 .
SFX 3 0 мо . +Q
SFX 3 0 молор . +Q+Indf
SFX 3 0 дор . +Indf
SFX 3 0 со . +Clt/сы
SFX 3 0 доҡо/137,341 . +Poss
SFX 3 0 ҡай/139 . +Dim
SFX 3 0 дай/141 . +Der/дай
SFX 3 0 са/143 . +Der/са
SFX 3 0 дағы/145 . +Der/дағы
SFX 3 0 дағылар/115 . +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 3 0 ло/149 . +Der/лы
SFX 3 0 һоҙ/153 . +Abe
SFX 3 0 ғаса/155 . +Der/ҡаса
SFX 3 0 ораҡтар/115 . +Comp+Pl
SFX 3 0 ораҡтың/117 . +Comp+Gen
SFX 3 0 ораҡҡа/121 . +Comp+Dat
SFX 3 0 ораҡты/121 . +Comp+Acc
SFX 3 0 ораҡтан/117,339 . +Comp+Abl
SFX 3 0 ораҡта/121,339 . +Comp+Loc
SFX 3 0 ораҡмын/126 . +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 3 0 ораҡһың/126 . +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 3 0 ораҡбыҙ/130 . +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 3 0 ораҡһығыҙ/130 . +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 3 0 ораҡ/205 . +Comp
SFX 3 0 ораҡмы . +Comp+Q
SFX 3 0 ораҡмылыр . +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 3 0 ораҡтыр . +Comp+Indf
SFX 3 0 ораҡсы . +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 3 0 ораҡтыҡы/135,339 . +Comp+Poss
SFX 3 0 ораҡҡай/139 . +Comp+Dim
SFX 3 0 ораҡтай/141 . +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 3 0 ораҡса/143 . +Comp+Der/са
SFX 3 0 ораҡтағы/145 . +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 3 0 ораҡтағылар/115 . +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 3 0 ораҡлы/147 . +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 3 0 ораҡһыҙ/151 . +Comp+Abe
SFX 3 0 ораҡҡаса/155 . +Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX 4 Y 50 # прилагательные A
SFX 4 0 дәр/116 . +Pl
SFX 4 0 дөң/120 . +Gen
SFX 4 0 гә/122 . +Dat
SFX 4 0 гәрәк . +Dat+Comp
SFX 4 0 дө/124 . +Acc
SFX 4 0 дән/118,340 . +Abl
SFX 4 0 дә/122,340 . +Loc
SFX 4 0 дәрәк . +Loc+Comp
SFX 4 0 мөн/129 . +Pred1Sg
SFX 4 0 һөң/129 . +Pred2Sg
SFX 4 0 бөҙ/133 . +Pred1Pl
SFX 4 0 һөгөҙ/133 . +Pred2Pl
SFX 4 0 0/198 .
SFX 4 0 мө . +Q
SFX 4 0 мөлөр . +Q+Indf
SFX 4 0 дөр . +Indf
SFX 4 0 сө . +Clt/сы
SFX 4 0 дөкө/138,342 . +Poss
SFX 4 0 кәй/140 . +Dim
SFX 4 0 дәй/142 . +Der/дай
SFX 4 0 сә/144 . +Der/са
SFX 4 0 дәге/146 . +Der/дағы
SFX 4 0 дәгеләр/116 . +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 4 0 лө/150 . +Der/лы
SFX 4 0 һөҙ/154 . +Abe
SFX 4 0 гәсә/156 . +Der/ҡаса
SFX 4 0 өрәктәр/116 . +Comp+Pl
SFX 4 0 өрәктең/118 . +Comp+Gen
SFX 4 0 өрәккә/122 . +Comp+Dat
SFX 4 0 өрәкте/122 . +Comp+Acc
SFX 4 0 өрәктән/118,340 . +Comp+Abl
SFX 4 0 өрәктә/122,340 . +Comp+Loc
SFX 4 0 өрәкмен/127 . +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 4 0 өрәкһең/127 . +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 4 0 өрәкбеҙ/131 . +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 4 0 өрәкһегеҙ/131 . +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 4 0 өрәк/207 . +Comp
SFX 4 0 өрәкме . +Comp+Q
SFX 4 0 өрәкмелер . +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 4 0 өрәктер . +Comp+Indf
SFX 4 0 өрәксе . +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 4 0 өрәктеке/136,340 . +Comp+Poss
SFX 4 0 өрәккәй/140 . +Comp+Dim
SFX 4 0 өрәктәй/142 . +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 4 0 өрәксә/144 . +Comp+Der/са
SFX 4 0 өрәктәге/146 . +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 4 0 өрәктәгеләр/116 . +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 4 0 өрәкле/148 . +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 4 0 өрәкһеҙ/152 . +Comp+Abe
SFX 4 0 өрәккәсә/156 . +Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX 5 Y 76 # прилагательные A
SFX 5 0 ҙар/115 [^ь] +Pl
SFX 5 ь ҙар/115 [ь] +Pl
SFX 5 0 ҙың/117 [^ь] +Gen
SFX 5 ь ҙың/117 [ь] +Gen
SFX 5 0 ға/121 [^ь] +Dat
SFX 5 ь ға/121 [ь] +Dat
SFX 5 0 ғараҡ [^ь] +Dat+Comp
SFX 5 ь ғараҡ [ь] +Dat+Comp
SFX 5 0 ҙы/121 [^ь] +Acc
SFX 5 ь ҙы/121 [ь] +Acc
SFX 5 0 ҙан/117,339 [^ь] +Abl
SFX 5 ь ҙан/117,339 [ь] +Abl
SFX 5 0 ҙа/121,339 [^ь] +Loc
SFX 5 ь ҙа/121,339 [ь] +Loc
SFX 5 0 ҙараҡ [^ь] +Loc+Comp
SFX 5 ь ҙараҡ [ь] +Loc+Comp
SFX 5 0 мын/126 [^ь] +Pred1Sg
SFX 5 ь мын/126 [ь] +Pred1Sg
SFX 5 0 һың/126 [^ь] +Pred2Sg
SFX 5 ь һың/126 [ь] +Pred2Sg
SFX 5 0 быҙ/130 [^ь] +Pred1Pl
SFX 5 ь быҙ/130 [ь] +Pred1Pl
SFX 5 0 һығыҙ/130 [^ь] +Pred2Pl
SFX 5 ь һығыҙ/130 [ь] +Pred2Pl
SFX 5 0 0/195 [^ь]
SFX 5 ь 0/195 [ь]
SFX 5 0 мы [^ь] +Q
SFX 5 ь мы [ь] +Q
SFX 5 0 мылыр [^ь] +Q+Indf
SFX 5 ь мылыр [ь] +Q+Indf
SFX 5 0 ҙыр [^ь] +Indf
SFX 5 ь ҙыр [ь] +Indf
SFX 5 0 сы [^ь] +Clt/сы
SFX 5 ь сы [ь] +Clt/сы
SFX 5 0 ҙыҡы/135,339 [^ь] +Poss
SFX 5 ь ҙыҡы/135,339 [ь] +Poss
SFX 5 0 ҡай/139 [^ь] +Dim
SFX 5 ь ҡай/139 [ь] +Dim
SFX 5 0 ҙай/141 [^ь] +Der/дай
SFX 5 ь ҙай/141 [ь] +Der/дай
SFX 5 0 са/143 [^ь] +Der/са
SFX 5 ь са/143 [ь] +Der/са
SFX 5 0 ҙағы/145 [^ь] +Der/дағы
SFX 5 ь ҙағы/145 [ь] +Der/дағы
SFX 5 0 ҙағылар/115 [^ь] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 5 ь ҙағылар/115 [ь] +Der/дағы+PL
SFX 5 0 лы/147 [^ь] +Der/лы
SFX 5 ь лы/147 [ь] +Der/лы
SFX 5 0 һыҙ/151 [^ь] +Abe
SFX 5 ь һыҙ/151 [ь] +Abe
SFX 5 0 ғаса/155 [^ь] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 5 ь ғаса/155 [ь] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 5 0 ыраҡтар/115 . +Comp+Pl
SFX 5 0 ыраҡтың/117 . +Comp+Gen
SFX 5 0 ыраҡҡа/121 . +Comp+Dat
SFX 5 0 ыраҡты/121 . +Comp+Acc
SFX 5 0 ыраҡтан/117,339 . +Comp+Abl
SFX 5 0 ыраҡта/121,339 . +Comp+Loc
SFX 5 0 ыраҡмын/126 . +Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX 5 0 ыраҡһың/126 . +Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX 5 0 ыраҡбыҙ/130 . +Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX 5 0 ыраҡһығыҙ/130 . +Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX 5 0 ыраҡ/205 . +Comp
SFX 5 0 ыраҡмы . +Comp+Q
SFX 5 0 ыраҡмылыр . +Comp+Q+Indf
SFX 5 0 ыраҡтыр . +Comp+Indf
SFX 5 0 ыраҡсы . +Comp+Clt/сы
SFX 5 0 ыраҡтыҡы/135,339 . +Comp+Poss
SFX 5 0 ыраҡҡай/139 . +Comp+Dim
SFX 5 0 ыраҡтай/141 . +Comp+Der/дай
SFX 5 0 ыраҡса/143 . +Comp+Der/са
SFX 5 0 ыраҡтағы/145 . +Comp+Der/дағы
SFX 5 0 ыраҡтағылар/115 . +Comp+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 5 0 ыраҡлы/147 . +Comp+Der/лы
SFX 5 0 ыраҡһыҙ/151 . +Comp+Abe
SFX 5 0 ыраҡҡаса/155 . +Comp+Der/ҡаса
